West Virginia, session 2026, HB4202.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. Authorization for Department of administration to promulgate legislative rules. §64-2-1. Board of Risk and Insurance Management. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 18, 2025, authorized under the authority of §33-30-15 of this code, modified by the Board of Risk and Insurance Management to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 14, 2025, relating to the Board of Risk and Insurance Management (mine subsidence insurance, 115 CSR 01), is authorized.